Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, HB1967.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. Title 74 of the Pennsylvania Consolidated Statutes is amended by adding a section to read:§ 8310. Designation of Allegheny River Boulevard as scenic byway.(a) Designation.--Because of its outstanding scenic, historic, natural, recreational and archeological characteristics and qualities and because of opportunities for economic development and tourism and for conservation of the outstanding qualities, the following is designated as a scenic byway and subject to the provisions of 23 U.S.C. § 131 (relating to control of outdoor advertising):(1) State Route 130, commonly known as Allegheny River Boulevard, beginning in the City of Pittsburgh at the 123456789101112131415161718 intersection of State Route 8, known as Washington Boulevard, continuing northeast into the Municipality of Penn Hills to the intersection of Sandy Creek Road.(2) The byway continuing along the route known as Allegheny River Boulevard through the Boroughs of Verona and Oakmont, ending at Hulton Road.(b) Effect of designation.--An outdoor advertising device, as defined in section 3(5) of the act of December 15, 1971 (P.L.596, No.160), known as the Outdoor Advertising Control Act of 1971, may not be erected:(1) within 660 feet of the nearest edge of the right-of-way; or(2) more than 660 feet from the nearest edge of the right-of-way, outside of urban areas, if the sign is visible from the main-traveled way of the scenic byway and the purpose of the sign is that its message be read from the main-traveled way of the scenic byway, except:(i) the official signs and notices which are required or authorized by law and which conform to the national standards promulgated by the United States Secretary of Transportation in accordance with 23 U.S.C. § 131;(ii) outdoor advertising devices advertising the sale or lease of the real property upon which they are located;(iii) outdoor advertising devices advertising activities conducted on the property on which they are located, including devices which display a message that may be changed at reasonable intervals by electronic process or remote control; and20250HB1967PN2482 - 2 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (iv) directional signs, including signs pertaining to natural wonders, scenic and historical attractions and other points of interest to the traveling public which conform to the national standards promulgated by the United States Secretary of Transportation in accordance with 23 U.S.C. § 131.(c) Public use maps.--All public use maps produced by the department for travel, tourism and business interests shall give special identification of the route under this section and briefly summarize that the General Assembly established the designation because of the outstanding scenic, historic, natural, recreational and archeological characteristics and outstanding qualities and opportunities for economic development, tourism and conservation of the sights along the route.Section 2. This act shall take effect in 60 days.20250HB1967PN2482 - 3 - 12345678910111213141516